Utah statutes.
16-10a-1331.   Court costs and counsel fees.

(1)  The court in an appraisal proceeding commenced under Section 16-10a-1330 shall determine all costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court.  The court shall assess the costs against the corporation, except that the court may assess costs against all or some of the dissenters, in amounts the court finds equitable, to the extent the court finds that the dissenters acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith in demanding payment under Section 16-10a-1328.

(2)  The court may also assess the fees and expenses of counsel and experts for the respective parties, in amounts the court finds equitable:

(a)  against the corporation and in favor of any or all dissenters if the court finds the corporation did not substantially comply with the requirements of Sections 16-10a-1320 through 16-10a-1328; or

(b)  against either the corporation or one or more dissenters, in favor of any other party, if the court finds that the party against whom the fees and expenses are assessed acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by this part.

(3)  If the court finds that the services of counsel for any dissenter were of substantial benefit to other dissenters similarly situated, and that the fees for those services should not be assessed against the corporation, the court may award to those counsel reasonable fees to be paid out of the amounts awarded the dissenters who were benefited.

